zh-TW: 清潔墊清潔作用: 吸收液體; 拋光; 脫脂; 消毒; 除塵; 多用途; 拋光墊; 刷洗; 去污漬; 其他
en: Pad cleaning action: Absorbing Liquids; Buffing; Degreasing; Disinfecting; Dusting; Multi-Purpose; Polishing; Scrubbing; Stain Removal; Other
fi: Tyynyjen puhdistustoiminto: Nesteiden imeytyminen; Kiillotus; Rasvanpoisto; Desinfiointi; Pölynpoisto; Monikäyttöinen; Kiillotus; Kuuraus; Tahranpoisto; Muu
sv: Rengöring av dynor: Absorberande vätskor; Polering; Avfettning; Desinficera; Damning; Multifunktionell; Polering; Skrubba; Fläckborttagningsmedel; Övrigt
el: Δράση καθαρισμού πανιού: Απορροφητικά υγρά; Γυάλισμα; Απολίπανση; Απολυμαντικό; Ξεσκόνισμα; Πολλαπλών χρήσεων; Στίλβωμα; Τρίψιμο; Αφαίρεση λεκέδων; Άλλο
ja: パッドのクリーニング作用: 吸収性液体; バフ研磨; 脱脂; 殺菌; ほこり払い; マルチパーパス; 研磨; こすり洗い; 汚れ落とし; その他
lt-LT: Šveitimo pado valymo tipas: Absorbuojantys skysčiai; Poliravimas; Riebalų šalinimas; Dezinfekcinis; Dulkių valymas; Daugiafunkcis; Poliravimas; Šveitimas; Dėmių šalinimas; Kita
es: Acción de limpieza de la almohadilla: Absorbiendo líquidos; Pulido; Desengrasante; Desinfectante; Para quitar el polvo; Multiusos; Pulido; Depuración; Quitamanchas; Otros
pt-PT: Ação de limpeza da esponja: Líquidos absorventes; Polimento; Desengorduramento; Desinfetante; Limpeza do pó; Multiuso; Polimento; Esfregar; Removedor de manchas; Outro
tr: Ped temizleme işlevi: Sıvıları Emici; Parlatma; Yağ giderme; Dezenfektan; Toz alma; Çok Amaçlı; Parlatma; Ovma; Leke çıkarıcı; Diğer
th: ลักษณะการทำความสะอาดของแผ่นขัด: ดูดซับของเหลว; ขัดเงา; ขจัดคราบไขมัน; การฆ่าเชื้อ; ปัดฝุ่น; อเนกประสงค์; การขัด; ขัดถู; การขจัดคราบ; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Ação de limpeza da almofada: Absorção de líquidos; Polimento superficial; Remoção de gordura; Desinfectante; Remoção de poeira; Multiuso; Polimento; Escovação pesada; Removedor de manchas; Outro
bg-BG: Начин на почистване на подложката: Абсорбиращи течности; Полиране; Обезмасляване; Дезинфектант; Бърсане на прах; Многоцелево; Полиране; Търкане; Премахване на петна; Друго
da: Puderengøring: Absorberende væsker; Polering; Affedtning; Desinfektion; Støvning; Flere formål; Polering; Skrubning; Pletfjernelse; Andet
ro-RO: Acțiune de curățare a discului: Absorbția lichidelor; Lustruire; Degresare; Dezinfectant; Ștergerea prafului; Multifuncțional; Lustruire; Frecare; Îndepărtarea petelor; Altele
pl: Działanie czyszczące nakładki: Chłonące płyny; Polerowanie; Odtłuszczanie; Dezynfekujące; Odkurzanie; Wielofunkcyjne; Polerowanie; Szorowanie; Usuwanie plam; Pozostałe
fr: Action de nettoyage du tampon: Absorption de liquides; Polissage; Dégraissage; Désinfectant; Dépoussiérage; Polyvalent; Polissage; Récurage; Détachant; Autre
ru: Тип очищающего действия насадки: Впитывание жидкостей; Полировка; Обезжиривание; Дезинфекция; Удаление пыли; Универсальное использование; Полировка; Чистка; Удаление пятен; Другое
vi: Cơ chế làm sạch của miếng lót/miếng đệm: Thấm hút chất lỏng; Đánh bóng; Tẩy dầu mỡ; Khử trùng; Lau bụi; Đa mục đích; Mài bóng; Cọ rửa; Loại bỏ vết bẩn; Khác
hr-HR: Radnja čišćenja jastučića: Apsorbiranje tekućina; Poliranje; Odmašćivanje; Dezinfekcija; Uklanjanje prašine; Višenamjensko; Poliranje; Ribanje; Sredstvo za uklanjanje mrlja; Ostalo
nb: Putens rengjøringsmekanisme: Absorberende væsker; Polering; Avfetting; Desinfiserende; Støvtørking; Flerbruk; Polering; Skrubbing; Flekkfjerning; Annet
sk-SK: Čistenie podložky: Absorbovanie tekutín; Leštenie; Odmasťovanie; Dezinfekčný; Utieranie prachu; Viacúčelový; Leštenie; Drhnutie; Odstraňovanie škvŕn; Iné
sl-SI: Čiščenje blazinic: Absorpcijske tekočine; Poliranje; Razmaščevanje; Razkuževanje; Brisanje prahu; Večnamenska; Poliranje; Čiščenje; Odstranjevanje madežev; Druga
nl: Reinigingswerking pad: Absorberende vloeistoffen; Polijsten; Ontvetten; Ontsmettend; Afstoffen; Multifunctioneel; Polijsten; Schrobben; Vlekverwijdering; Overig
it: Azione di pulizia del pad: Assorbimento di liquidi; Lucidatura; Sgrassante; Disinfettante; Spolverare; Multiuso; Lucidatura; Strofinare; Smacchiatore; Altro
zh-CN: 清洁垫的清洁方式: 吸液; 抛光; 去油; 消毒; 除尘; 多用途; 抛光; 擦洗; 去污; 其他
hu: Pad tisztítási művelet: Folyadékok felszívása; Csiszolás; Zsírtalanítás; Fertőtlenítő; Portörlés; Többcélú; Polírozás; Súrolás; Folteltávolítás; Egyéb
de: Padreinigungsfunktion: Absorption von Flüssigkeiten; Polieren; Entfettung; Desinfizierend; Abstauben; Mehrzweck; Polier; Schrubben; Fleckenentfernung; Sonstiges
ko: 패드 세척 기능: 액체 흡수; 광택/연마; 기름때 제거; 살균; 먼지 제거; 다목적; 연마; 스크러빙; 얼룩 제거제; 기타
cs: Čisticí účinek podložky: Absorpce tekutin; Leštění; Odmašťování; Dezinfekční; Utírání prachu; Univerzální využití; Leštění; Drhnutí; Odstraňování skvrn; Jiné